Utah, session 2026, SB79.
Section 1. Section 20A-7-203 is amended to read:20A-7-203. Manual initiative process -- Form of initiative petition and signature sheets.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process.(2)(a)Each proposed initiative petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"INITIATIVE PETITION To the Honorable ____, Lieutenant Governor:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully demand that the following proposed law be submitted to the legal voters/Legislature of Utah for their/its approval or rejection at the regular general election/session to be held/ beginning on _________(month\day\year);Each signer says:I have personally signed this initiative petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the initiative petition;I have personally read the entire statement included with this packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name.NOTICE TO SIGNERS:Public hearings to discuss this initiative were held at: (list dates and locations of public hearings.)".(b)If the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement shall appear, in at least 14-point, bold type, immediately following the information described in Subsection (2)(a):"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate.".(c)The sponsors of an initiative or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the proposed law to each initiative petition.(3)Each initiative signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the initiative printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point, bold type;(d)include a table immediately below the title of the initiative, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following statement, "By signing this initiative petition, you are stating that you have read and understand the law proposed by this initiative petition." in 12-point type;(e)the table described in Subsection (3)(d) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet for the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(f)at the bottom of the sheet, include in the following order:(i)the words "Fiscal Impact of" followed by the title of the initiative, in at least 12-point, bold type;(ii)except as provided in Subsection (5), the initial fiscal impact statement issued by the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-202.5(2)(a), including any update in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5), in not less than 12-point type;(iii)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement in 12-point, bold type:"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; and(iv)the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign an initiative petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same initiative petition, or to sign an initiative petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records.  If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."(4)The final page of each initiative packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this initiative packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this initiative packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law proposed by the initiative;I believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer has read the law proposed by the initiative, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah;The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name; andI have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this initiative packet to encourage that individual to sign it.______________________________________________________________________(Name)(Signature)                 (Residence Address)                                         (Date)(5)If the initial fiscal impact statement described in Subsection (3)(f)(ii), as updated in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5), exceeds 200 words, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall prepare a shorter summary statement, for the purpose of inclusion on an initiative signature sheet, that does not exceed 200 words.(6)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the initiative petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 20A-7-303 is amended to read:20A-7-303. Manual referendum process -- Form of referendum petition and signature sheets.(1)This section applies only to the manual referendum process.(2)(a)Each proposed referendum petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"REFERENDUM PETITION To the Honorable ____, Lieutenant Governor:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully order that Senate (or House) Bill No.  ____, entitled (title of act, and, if the petition is against less than the whole act, set forth here the part or parts on which the referendum is sought), passed by the Legislature of the state of Utah during the ____ Session, be referred to the people of Utah for their approval or rejection at a regular general election or a statewide special election;Each signer says:I have personally signed this referendum petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the referendum petition;I have personally read the entire statement included with this referendum packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name.".(b)The sponsors of a referendum or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the law that is the subject of the referendum to each referendum petition.(3)Each referendum signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the referendum printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point, bold type;(d)include a table immediately below the title of the referendum, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following words "By signing this referendum petition, you are stating that you have read and understand the law that this referendum petition seeks to overturn." in 12-point type;(e)the table described in Subsection (3)(d) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet for the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(f)at the bottom of the sheet, include the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign a referendum petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same referendum petition, or to sign a referendum petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records. If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."(4)The final page of each referendum packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this referendum packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this referendum packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law this petition seeks to overturn;I believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer has read the law that the referendum seeks to overturn, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah;The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name; andI have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this referendum packet to encourage that individual to sign it.________________________________________________________________________(Name)Signature                       (Residence Address)                                  (Date).(5)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the referendum petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 20A-7-503 is amended to read:20A-7-503. Manual initiative process -- Form of initiative petition and signature sheet.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process.(2)(a)Each proposed initiative petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"INITIATIVE PETITION To the Honorable ____, County Clerk/City Recorder/Town Clerk:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully demand that the following proposed law be submitted to: the legislative body for its approval or rejection at its next meeting; and the legal voters of the county/city/town, if the legislative body rejects the proposed law or takes no action on it.Each signer says:I have personally signed this initiative petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the petition;I have personally read the entire statement included with this packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name."(b)If the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement shall appear, in at least 14-point, bold type, immediately following the information described in Subsection (2)(a):"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."(c)The sponsors of an initiative or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the proposed law to each initiative petition.(3)Each initiative signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the initiative printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point, bold type;(d)include a table immediately below the title of the initiative, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following words "By signing this initiative petition, you are stating that you have read and understand the law proposed by this initiative petition." in 12-point type;(e)the table described in Subsection (3)(d) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet for the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(f)at the bottom of the sheet, include in the following order:(i)the words "Fiscal and legal impact of" followed by the title of the initiative, in at least 12-point, bold type;(ii)the summary statement in the initial fiscal impact and legal statement issued by the budget officer in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-502.5(2)(b) and the cost estimate for printing and distributing information related to the initiative petition in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-502.5(3), in not less than 12-point, bold type;(iii)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement in 12-point, bold type:"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; and(iv)the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign an initiative petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same initiative petition, or to sign an initiative petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records.  If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."(4)The final page of each initiative packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:"Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this initiative packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law proposed by the initiative; andI believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer has read the law proposed by the initiative, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah.;______________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date)The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name.; andI have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this petition to encourage that individual to sign it._____________________________________________________________________(Name)(Signature) (Residence Address) (Date)".(5)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the initiative petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 20A-7-603 is amended to read:20A-7-603. Manual referendum process -- Form of referendum petition and signature sheet.(1)This section applies only to the manual referendum process.(2)(a)Each proposed referendum petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"REFERENDUM PETITION To the Honorable ____, County Clerk/City Recorder/Town Clerk:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully order that (description of local law or portion of local law being challenged), passed by the ____ be referred to the voters for their approval or rejection at the regular/municipal general election to be held on __________(month\day\year);Each signer says:I have personally signed this referendum petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the petition;I have personally read the entire statement included with this packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name."(b)The sponsors of a referendum or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the law that is the subject of the referendum to each referendum petition.(3)Each referendum signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the referendum printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point type;(d)include a table immediately below the title of the referendum, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following words, "By signing this referendum petition, you are stating that you have read and understand the law that this referendum petition seeks to overturn." in 12-point type;(e)the table described in Subsection (3)(d) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet or the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(f)at the bottom of the sheet, include the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign a referendum petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same referendum petition, or to sign a referendum petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records. If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."(4)The final page of each referendum packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:"Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this referendum packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law this petition seeks to overturn; andI believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer has read the law that the referendum seeks to overturn, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah.;________________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date)The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name.; andI have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this referendum packet to encourage that individual to sign it._____________________________________________________________________(Name)(Signature) (Residence Address) (Date)".(5)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the referendum petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 5:
Section 5.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.